test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-2_gt-norm.yaml
  Adjective - bielljis: # 
    bielljis+A+Attr: [bielljis, bielljisis]
    bielljis+A+Sg+Nom: bielljis
    bielljis+A+Sg+Com: bielljisijn
    bielljis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: bielljisabbo
    bielljis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: bielljisamos
    bielljis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bielljisappot
    bielljis+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bielljisabmusit
    bielljis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: bielljisappusj
    bielljis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bielljisapputjit
    bielljis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bielljisit
    bielljis+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [bielljisvuohta,bielljisisvuohta]

  Adjective - guojttis: # 
    guojttis+A+Attr: [guojttis, guojttisis]
    guojttis+A+Sg+Nom: guojttis
    guojttis+A+Sg+Com: guojttisijn
    guojttis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: guojttisabbo
    guojttis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: guojttisamos
    guojttis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guojttisappot
    guojttis+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guojttisabmusit
    guojttis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: guojttisappusj
    guojttis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guojttisapputjit
    guojttis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guojttisit
    guojttis+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [guojttisvuohta, guojttisisvuohta]

  Adjective - ieŋŋils: # IENNILS
    ieŋŋils+A+Attr: ieŋŋils
    ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Nom: ieŋŋils
    ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Acc: ieŋŋilsav
    ieŋŋils+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ieŋŋils+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Adjective - alek: # RIHTSOK LEXATTR
    alek+A+Attr: alek
    alek+A+Sg+Nom: alek
    alek+A+Pl+Nom: alega
    alek+A+Sg+Acc: alegav
    alek+A+Sg+Ill: alegij
    alek+A+Sg+Ine: alegin
    alek+A+Ess: alegin
    alek+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: alegabbo
    alek+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ela: alegappos
    alek+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: alegamos
    alek+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: alegappot
    alek+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: alegabmusit
    alek+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: alegappusj
    alek+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: alegapputjit
    alek+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: alegit
    alek+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: alekvuohta

  Adjective - vedjat: # 
    vedjat+A+Attr: vieddjis
    vedjat+A+Sg+Nom: [vedjat, vädjat, vædjat]
    vedjat+A+Sg+Ine: [veddjadin, vædjadin, vädjadin]

  Adjective - luobes: # 
    luobes+A+Attr: luobes
    luobes+A+Sg+Nom: luobes
    luobes+A+Sg+Ine: luohpásin
